Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5798HV (2) 91 ms/js H.F. 2636 Section 1. Section 414.5, Code 2026, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 414.5 Changes ââ protest. 3 The regulations, restrictions, and boundaries may, from 4 time to time, be amended, supplemented, changed, modified, 5 or repealed. Notwithstanding section 414.2 , as a part of an 6 ordinance changing land from one zoning district to another 7 zoning district or an ordinance approving a site development 8 plan, a council may impose conditions on a property owner 9 which that are in addition to existing regulations if the 10 additional conditions have been agreed to in writing by the 11 property owner before the public hearing required under this 12 section or any adjournment of the hearing. The conditions 13 must be reasonable and imposed to satisfy public needs which 14 that are directly caused by the requested change. In case, 15 however, of a written protest against a change or repeal which 16 that is filed with the city clerk and signed by a majority of 17 the owners of twenty percent or more of the area of the lots 18 included in the proposed change or repeal, or by the owners of 19 twenty percent or more of the property which that is located 20 within two hundred feet of the exterior boundaries of the 21 property for which the change or repeal is proposed, the change 22 or repeal shall not become effective except by the favorable 23 vote of at least three-fourths two-thirds of all the members of 24 the council. The protest, if filed, must be filed before or at 25 the public hearing. The provisions of section 414.4 relative 26 to public hearings and official notice apply equally to all 27 changes or amendments. 28